Tennessee, session 114, SB1545.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-247(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (51).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-248(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) State energy policy council, created by § 68-204-101;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1545
010103
- 1 -